Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4601
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-4601 to
29-4608 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Claims for Wrongful
Conviction and Imprisonment Act.

Laws 2009, LB260, § 1.